Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PROCTOR; UTILITY EXTENSIONS AND UPGRADES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $3,500,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to the city of Proctor to predesign, design, and construct water, sewer, and electric utility extensions from Ugstad Road on the north side of marked Interstate Highway 35 to the south side and extending along the frontage road and utility replacements from Ugstad Road on the north side of marked Interstate Highway 35 to 2nd Street. This appropriation does not require a nonstate match. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $3,500,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end